tex/context/patterns/mkii/lang-id.hyp
% generated by mtxrun --script pattern --convert

% for comment and copyright, see lang-id.rme

% used: a b d e g h i k l m n o p r s t u w

\hyphenation{
be-ra-be
be-ra-hi
be-rak
be-ran-da
be-ran-dal
be-rang
be-ra-ngas-an
be-rang-sang
be-ra-ngus
be-ra-ni
be-ran-tak-an
be-ran-tam
be-ran-tas
be-ra-pa
be-ras
be-ren-deng
be-re-ngut
be-re-rot
be-res
be-re-wok
be-ri
be-ri-ngas
be-ri-sik
be-ri-ta
be-rok
be-ron-dong
be-ron-tak
be-ru-du
be-ruk
be-run-tun
peng-eks-por
peng-im-por
te-ra
te-rang
te-ras
te-ra-si
te-ra-tai
te-ra-wang
te-ra-weh
te-ri-ak
te-ri-gu
te-rik
te-ri-ma
te-ri-pang
te-ro-bos
te-ro-bos-an
te-ro-mol
te-rom-pah
te-rom-pet
te-ro-pong
te-ro-wong-an
te-ru-buk
te-ru-na
te-rus
te-ru-si}
